Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Procedure.

Sec. 29.05.060.
Petition.

Municipal incorporation is proposed by filing a petition with the department. The petition must include the following information about the proposed municipality:

class;

name;

boundaries;

maps, documents, and other information required by the department;

composition and apportionment of the governing body;

a proposed operating budget for the municipality projecting sources of income and items of expenditure through the first full fiscal year of operation;

for a borough or unified municipality, based on the number who voted in the respective areas in the last general election, the signature and resident address of 15 percent of the voters in

home rule and first class cities in the area of the proposed borough or unified municipality; and

the area of the proposed borough or unified municipality outside home rule and first class cities;

for a first class borough or unified municipality, a designation of areawide powers to be exercised;

for a second class borough, a designation of areawide and nonareawide powers to be exercised;

for a first class, second class, or home rule city, a designation of the powers to be exercised;

for a first class or home rule city, based on the number who voted in the area in the last general election, the signatures and resident addresses of 50 voters in the proposed city or of 15 percent of the voters in the proposed city, whichever is greater;

for a second class city, based on the number who voted in the area in the last general election, the signatures and resident addresses of 25 voters in the proposed city or of 15 percent of the voters in the proposed city, whichever is greater;

for a home rule city, home rule borough, or unified municipality, a proposed home rule charter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.05.070.
Review.

The department shall review an incorporation petition for content and signatures and shall return a deficient petition for correction and completion.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.05.080.
Investigation.

If an incorporation petition contains the required information and signatures, the department shall investigate the proposal and shall hold at least one public informational meeting in the area proposed for incorporation. The department shall publish notice of the meeting.

The department may combine incorporation petitions from the same general area.

The department shall report its findings to the Local Boundary Commission with its recommendations regarding the incorporation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.05.090.
Hearing.

The Local Boundary Commission shall hold at least one public hearing in the area proposed to be incorporated for the purpose of receiving testimony and evidence on the proposal.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.05.100.
Decision.

After providing public notice of each proposed amendment or condition and an opportunity for public comment, the Local Boundary Commission may amend the petition and may impose conditions on the incorporation. If the commission determines that the incorporation, as amended or conditioned if appropriate, meets applicable standards under the state constitution and commission regulations, meets the standards for incorporation under AS

29.05.011

or

29.05.031

, and is in the best interests of the state, it may accept the petition. Otherwise, it shall reject the petition.

A Local Boundary Commission decision under this section may be appealed under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 58 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for incorporation of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 1.

For standards for incorporation of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 2.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 28, 2006, added “After providing public notice of each proposed amendment or condition and an opportunity for public comment” at the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a).

Sec. 29.05.110.
Incorporation election.

The Local Boundary Commission shall immediately notify the director of elections of its acceptance of an incorporation petition. Within 30 days after notification, the director of elections shall order an election in the proposed municipality to determine whether the voters desire incorporation and, if so, to elect the initial municipal officials. If incorporation is rejected, no officials are elected. The election shall be held not less than 30 or more than 90 days after the date of the election order. The election order must specify the dates during which nomination petitions for election of initial officials may be filed.

A qualified voter who is registered to vote within the proposed municipality at least 30 days before the date of the election order may vote.

Areawide borough powers included in an incorporation petition are considered to be part of the incorporation question. In an election for the incorporation of a second class borough, each nonareawide power to be exercised is placed separately on the ballot. Adoption of a nonareawide power requires a majority of the votes cast on the question, and the vote is limited to the qualified voters who are registered to vote in the proposed borough but outside all cities in the proposed borough.

A home rule charter included in an incorporation petition under AS

29.05.060

(13) is considered to be part of the incorporation question. The home rule charter is adopted if the voters approve incorporation of the city, borough, or unified municipality.

The director of elections shall supervise the election in the general manner prescribed by AS 15 (Election Code). The state shall pay all election costs under this section.

In this section, “qualified voter” has the meaning given in AS

15.80.010

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 1994; am §§ 58 — 60 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (f), “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When there is a tie vote in a city incorporation election, the incorporation of the municipality is considered to have been rejected by the voters. While AS

29.05.110

does not specify that a majority of voters must approve incorporation, it does require a showing that the voters ‘‘desire incorporation’’, which implies the need for a majority of voters to approve the incorporation. October 16, 1997 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 25.

Sec. 29.05.115.
Incorporation with legislative review.

If the Local Boundary Commission submits a proposal for borough incorporation to the legislature under art. X, sec. 12, Constitution of the State of Alaska, AS

29.05.060

—

29.05.110

do not apply. However, before the proposal is submitted to the legislature, the Local Boundary Commission shall hold at least two public hearings in the area proposed for incorporation.

This section may not be construed as granting authority to the Local Boundary Commission to propose a borough incorporation under art. X, sec. 12, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 46 SLA 2006)

Sec. 29.05.120.
Election of initial officials.

Nominations for initial municipal officials are made by petition. The petition shall be in the form prescribed by the director of elections and must include the name and address of the nominee and a statement of the nominee that the nominee is qualified under the provisions of this title for the office that is sought. A person may file for and occupy more than one office, but may not serve simultaneously as

borough mayor and as a member of the assembly; or

city mayor and as a member of the council in a first class city.

Except for a proposed second class city, petitions to nominate initial officials must include the signature and resident address of 50 voters in the area of the proposed municipality, or that area of the proposed municipality from which the officials are to be elected under the composition and apportionment set out in the accepted incorporation petition.

Petitions to nominate initial officials of a second class city must include the signature and resident address of 10 voters in the area of the proposed city.

The director of elections shall supervise the election in the general manner prescribed by AS 15 (Election Code). The state shall pay all election costs.

The initial elected officials take office on the first Monday following certification of their election.

The initial elected members of the governing body shall determine by lot the length of their terms of office so that a proportionate number of terms expire each year, resulting in staggered terms of office for members subsequently elected.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 124 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 213 et seq.

Sec. 29.05.130.
Integration of special districts and service areas.

A service area in a newly incorporated municipality shall be integrated into the municipality within two years after the date of incorporation. On integration the municipality succeeds to all the rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the service area. On integration all property in the service area subject to taxation to pay the principal and interest on bonds at the time of integration remains subject to taxation for that purpose.

After integration, the municipality may exercise in a former service area all of the rights and powers exercised by the service area at the time of integration, and, as successor to the service area, may levy and collect special charges, taxes, or assessments to amortize bonded indebtedness incurred by the service area or by a municipality in which the service area was formerly located.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to integrating existing special service districts into new boroughs, see Alaska Const., art. X, § 15.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When boroughs assumed powers previously exercised by service areas, public utility districts, and school districts, they were required to assume the following duties: contractual obligations, and liability on bonded and other indebtedness under a former, similar provision. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 29.

Sec. 29.05.140.
Transition.

The powers and duties exercised by cities and service areas that are succeeded to by a newly incorporated municipality continue to be exercised by the cities and service areas until the new municipality assumes the powers and functions, which may not exceed two years after the date of incorporation. Ordinances, rules, resolutions, procedures, and orders in effect before the transfer remain in effect until superseded by the action of the new municipality.

Before the assumption, the new municipality shall give written notice of its assumption of the rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities under this section and AS

29.05.130

to the city or service area concerned. Municipal officials shall consult with the officials of the city or service area concerned and arrange an orderly transfer.

After the incorporation of a new municipality, a service area in it may not assume new bonded indebtedness, make a contract, or transfer an asset without the consent of the governing body.

Upon incorporation, the home rule charter of a unified municipality operates to dissolve all municipalities in the area unified in accordance with the charter.

Unless the incorporation takes effect on January 1, the newly incorporated municipality may not levy property taxes before January 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the incorporation takes effect.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 11 ch 58 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1994, at which time former (d) was relettered as (e). Subsection (e) was enacted as (f).
Relettered in 2004, at which time former (e) was relettered as (f).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 5, 2004, added subsection (f) [now (e)].

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under a former, similar provision, city ordinances affecting public health remained in effect for a period not to exceed two years from the date of the borough’s incorporation or until superseded by ordinances passed by the borough, and it was superfluous to include this in the incorporation petition. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

A teacher who had served a two-year probationary period in a rural or district school, and who obtained tenure in that school, retained his tenure status when the school became part of an organized borough under a former, similar provision. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

Under a former, similar provision, a newly incorporated borough assumed administrative responsibility for a state-operated school within its boundaries immediately after incorporation. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 23.

The clear meaning of a former, similar provision was that after the incorporation of an organized borough and until the powers exercised by service areas and special districts were assumed by the borough, service areas and special districts could not assume new bonded indebtedness, make any contract, or transfer any asset without first receiving the consent of the borough assembly. There was no limitation on the type of contract into which the service area or special district might enter except that the approval of the borough assembly first be obtained. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 29.

A borough had to repay a city for advances made from city general fund to pay debts incurred in behalf of the city school district under a former, similar provision. 1965 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 29.05.150.
Challenge of legality.

A person may not challenge the formation of a municipality except within six months after the date of its incorporation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1985)